src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
=================================== !
# The Votic morphophonological/twolc rules file 
=================================== !

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-hun/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

* d̕   d with U+0315
* D̕   D with U+0315
* @CODE t with U+0315
* T̕   T with U+0315
* l̕   l with U+0315
* L̕   L with U+0315

U+02BC MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE

Archiphones
 %{EAÕ%}:e	 Realized
 %{EAÕ%}:a	 Realized
 %{EAÕ%}:õ	 Realized

Triggers
 %^KS2S:0	 used in aluks:alus, perhaps also ps:s, ts:s
 %^WGStem:0	 used in mb:mm
 %^VowRm:0	 final vowel removal

VOWELS
**%{EAÕ%}:e**

**%{EAÕ%}:a**

**%{EAÕ%}:õ**

**Deletion of Vx**

**Deletion of õ **
**Deletion of a **

### CONSONANTS
WEAK GRADE
**Weakening of k to g**

REMOVAL
**Deleting k before stem-final s**

* aluks%^KS2S examples:*

* alu0s0 examples:*

**Deleting t in geminate tt**
tüttö+N+Sg+Gen: **girl/tyttö**
* *tüttö%^WGStem*
* *tüt0ö0*

**p:m in weak grade**

* ampa%^WGStem%^VowRmõz examples:*

* amm000õz examples:*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vot/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
